Massachusetts, session 194th, H3046.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 3, Part B, paragraph (b)(1) of Chapter 62 of the General Laws, as
appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following new
subparagraph:-
(D) an additional exemption of four thousand dollars if the taxpayer provided more than
one-half of the support for an elderly relative who has attained the age of seventy before the
taxable year, provided that the elderly relative resided with the taxpayer for more than six
months of the taxable year and provided further that the adjusted gross income of the taxpayer
does not exceed thirty thousand dollars for the year in which the exemption is being claimed.
of 2

SECTION 2. Section 3, Part B, paragraph (b)(2) of Chapter 62 of the General Laws is
amended by adding the following new subparagraph:-
(D) an additional exemption of four thousand dollars if the taxpayer provided more than
one-half of the support for the elderly relative who has attained the age of seventy before the
taxable year, provided that the elderly relative resided with the taxpayer for more than six
months of the taxable year and provided further that the adjusted gross income of the taxpayer
does not exceed forty thousand dollars of the taxable year in which the exemption is being
claimed.
SECTION 3. The commissioner shall adopt rules and regulations governing the
provisions of this act that are not consistent with the provisions contained herein.
SECTION 4. The provisions of this act shall be effective for taxable years beginning
January 1, 2027.
of 2